All Classes/sin.foma
define CE1 [  ු ණ ු |ූ |ු න ෙ ම ි | ු න ෙ ම ු |ු න ෙ හ ි | ු න ෙ හ ු | ු න ා ය | ු න ේ ය | ු න ෝ ය |  ේ
 | ෙ ම ි | ෙ ම ු | ෙ හ ි | ෙ හ ු | ෙ ය ි | ෙ ත ි | ව ෙ ය ි | ව ෙ ත ි | ව ේ |ි ය | ු ව ො ත් | ු ව ේ]; 



######### Rewrite rules

define CERule1  ි -> 0 || _ "^" [BE1 |EE1 | CE1 | DE1 | GE1] ;
define CERule2 ත -> ත ් ත || _ "^" [BE1 |EE1 ];
define CERule4 ත -> ත ්  || _ "^" [GE1];
define CERule2i ක -> ක ්  || _ "^" [BE1 | GE1 ];
define CERule3  [..] -> ැ || .#. A _ A ? * "^" CE1 ;

# To Cleanup: remove morpheme boundaries
define Cleanup "^" -> 0;

define E1Grammar 	LexiconE1 .o.
		CERule1		.o.
		CERule2		.o.
		CERule2i	.o.
              	CERule3		.o.
		CERule4		.o.
		Cleanup;


define Bf1 [ ු ණ ු | ු න ෙ ම ි | ු න ෙ ම ු | ු න ෙ හ ි | ු න ෙ හ ු | ු න ේ ය | ු න ා ය | ු න ෝ ය | ි ය න ් | ි ය ල ් ල ා];

define Cf1 [ව | ව ත ි | ව න ් න ී ය | ව න ් න ෙ ම ි | ව න ් න ෙ ම ු | ව න ් න ෙ හ ි | ව න ් න ෙ හ ු | ව න ් න ේ ය | ව න ් න ෝ ය | ව ම ි | ව ම ු | ව ය ි | ව හ ි | ව හ ු | ව න ් න ට | ව ම ි න ්];

define Df1 [ේ | ෙ ම ි | ෙ ම ු | ෙ හ ි | ෙ හ ු | ෙ ය ි | ෙ ත ි | ව ෙ ය ි | ව ෙ ත ි | ව ේ | ි ය | ු න ො ත ් | ු න ේ];

define Ef1 [ි ද];


read lexc f1.lexc
define Lexiconf1;

######### Rewrite rules

###
define UpadiAClass          ි -> 0 || A _ "^" [Bf1 | Cf1 | Df1 | Ef1] ;
define UpadiBClass          උ -> ඉ || .#. _ ?* "^" [Bf1 | Df1 | Ef1] ;
define UpadiCClass          ද -> 0 || A _ "^" Ef1 ;


# To Cleanup: remove morpheme boundaries
define Cleanup "^" -> 0;

define ClassE1Grammar 	Lexiconf1                 .o.
                        UpadiAClass             .o.
                        UpadiBClass             .o.
                        UpadiCClass             .o.
               	        Cleanup;

define Bf2 [ ු ණ ු | ු න ෙ ම ි | ු න ෙ ම ු | ු න ෙ හ ි | ු න ෙ හ ු | ු න ේ ය | ු න ා ය | ු න ෝ ය | ී | ි ය න ් | ි ය ල ් ල ා];

define Df2 [ේ | ෙ ම ි | ෙ ම ු | ෙ හ ි | ෙ හ ු | ෙ ය ි | ෙ ත ි | ි ය | ු න ො ත ් | ු න ේ];


read lexc f2.lexc
define Lexiconf2;

######### Rewrite rules

###
define WadiAClass          ි -> 0 || A _ "^" [Bf2 | Df2] ;
define WadiBClass          [..] -> ැ || .#. A _ A "^" [Bf2 | Df2] ;

# To Cleanup: remove morpheme boundaries
define Cleanup "^" -> 0;

define ClassF2Grammar 	Lexiconf2                .o.
                        WadiAClass             .o.
                        WadiBClass             .o.
               	        Cleanup;


define Bf3 [ග ෙ න];

define Cf3 [ව | ව ත ි | ව න ් න ී ය | ව න ් න ෙ ම ි | ව න ් න ෙ ම ු | ව න ් න ෙ හ ි | ව න ් න ෙ හ ු | ව න ් න ේ ය | ව න ් න ෝ ය | ව ම ි | ව ම ු | ව ය ි | ව හ ි | ව හ ු | ව න ් න ට | ව ම ි න ්];

define Df3 [ ි ය | ු න ො ත ් | ු න ේ];



read lexc f3.lexc
define Lexiconf3;

######### Rewrite rules

###
define UganiAClass          ි -> ් || A _ "^" Cf3 ;
define UganiBClass          උ ග න ි -> ඉ || _ "^" Bf3 ;
define UganiCClass          උ ග න ි -> ඉ ග ෙ න || _ "^" Df3 ;

# To Cleanup: remove morpheme boundaries
define Cleanup "^" -> 0;

define ClassF3Grammar 	Lexiconf3                 .o.
                        UganiAClass             .o.
                        UganiBClass             .o.
                        UganiCClass             .o.
               	        Cleanup;

define Bg1 [ ු ණ ු | ූ | ු න ෙ ම ි | ු න ෙ ම ු | ු න ෙ හ ි | ු න ෙ හ ු | ු න ේ ය | ු න ා ය | ු න ෝ ය | ව ෙ ය ි | ව ෙ ත ි | ව ේ | ී | ි ය න ් | ි ය ල ් ල ා | ි ය | ු න ො ත ් | ු න ේ];

define Cg1 [ව ත ි | ව න ් න ී ය | ව න ් න ෙ ම ි | ව න ් න ෙ ම ු | ව න ් න ෙ හ ි | ව න ් න ෙ හ ු | ව න ් න ේ ය | ව න ් න ෝ ය | ව ම ි | ව ම ු | ව ය ි | ව හ ි | ව හ ු | ව න ් න ට | ව ම ි න ්];



read lexc g1.lexc
define Lexicong1;

######### Rewrite rules

###SeraseA,HesireA,WehereA,HeppeA,DikgesseA,PelabeA
define SeraseAClass          ෙ -> 0 || .#. [ද ි ක ් | 0] A [ ැ | ෙ] A [ි | 0 | ැ | ්] A _  "^" [Bg1 | Cg1] ;

###SeraseB,HesireB,WehereB,HeppeB,DikgesseB
define SeraseBClass          ැ -> 0 || .#. [ද ි ක ් | 0] A _ A [ි | 0 | ැ | ්] A  "^" Cg1 ;

define HesireCClass           ි -> ු || .#. A A _ A  "^" Cg1 ;
define WehereCClass          ැ -> 0 || .#. A A _ A  "^" Cg1 ;

###DeneA,YedeA,ThereA,PeedeA
define DeneAClass            ෙ -> 0 || .#. A [ ැ | ෙ | ේ | ෑ] A _  "^" [Bg1 | Cg1] ;

define DeneBClass            ැ -> 0 || .#. A _ A  "^" Cg1 ;

###YedeB,PelabeB
define YedeBClass            ෙ -> ො || .#. A _ A [්| 0] [A | 0]  "^" Cg1 ;

define ThereBClass           ේ -> ෝ || .#. A _ A  "^" Cg1 ;
define PeedeBClass           ෑ -> ා || .#. A _ A  "^" Cg1 ;

define IpadeAClass           ෙ -> 0 || .#. ඉ A A _  "^" [Bg1 | Cg1] ;
define IpadeBClass           ඉ -> උ || .#. _ A A  "^" Cg1 ;



# To Cleanup: remove morpheme boundaries
define Cleanup "^" -> 0;

define Classg1Grammar 	Lexicong1               .o.
                        SeraseAClass          .o.
                        SeraseBClass          .o.
                        HesireCClass          .o.
                        WehereCClass          .o.
                        DeneAClass            .o.
                        DeneBClass            .o.
                        YedeBClass            .o.
                        ThereBClass           .o.
                        PeedeBClass           .o.
                        IpadeAClass           .o.
                        IpadeBClass           .o.
               	        Cleanup;


define Bg2 [ ු ණ ු | ූ | ු න ෙ ම ි | ු න ෙ ම ු | ු න ෙ හ ි | ු න ෙ හ ු | ු න ේ ය | ු න ා ය | ු න ෝ ය | ව ෙ ය ි | ව ෙ ත ි | ව ේ | ී | ි ය න ් | ි ය ල ් ල ා];

define Cg2 [ව ත ි | ව න ් න ී ය | ව න ් න ෙ ම ි | ව න ් න ෙ ම ු | ව න ් න ෙ හ ි | ව න ් න ෙ හ ු | ව න ් න ේ ය | ව න ් න ෝ ය | ව ම ි | ව ම ු | ව ය ි | ව හ ි | ව හ ු | ව න ් න ට | ව ම ි න ්];



read lexc g2.lexc
define Lexicong2;

######### Rewrite rules

###
define ElambeClass          ෙ -> 0 || .#. [ත ි| 0] [එ| ඈ| A] [ ි| ැ| 0] [A | 0] [ ි| ැ| ්| 0] A _  "^" [Bg2 | Cg2] ;


# To Cleanup: remove morpheme boundaries
define Cleanup "^" -> 0;

define Classg2Grammar 	Lexicong2               .o.
                        ElambeClass           .o.
               	        Cleanup;



define Bg3 [ ු න ් | ු න ් න ෙ ම ි | ු න ් න ෙ ම ු | ු න ් න ෙ හ ි | ු න ් න ෙ හ ු | ු න ් න ේ ය | ු න ් න ා ය | ු න ් න ෝ ය | ී | ි ය න ් | ි ය ල ් ල ා | ි ය | ු න ් න ො ත ් | ු න ් න ේ ];




read lexc g3.lexc
define Lexicong3;

######### Rewrite rules

###
define MoradeClass          ෙ -> 0 || ර A _ "^" Bg3 ;


# To Cleanup: remove morpheme boundaries
define Cleanup "^" -> 0;

define Classg3Grammar 	Lexicong3               .o.
                        MoradeClass           .o.
               	        Cleanup;



define Bg4 [ ු ණ ු | ු න ෙ ම ි | ු න ෙ ම ු | ු න ෙ හ ි | ු න ෙ හ ු | ු න ේ ය | ු න ා ය | ු න ෝ ය | ී | ි ය න ් | ි ය ල ් ල ා | ි ය | ු න ො ත ් | ු න ේ | ් ව ා | ් ව න ් න ේ];

define Cg4 [ව | ව ත ි | ව න ් න ී ය | ව න ් න ෙ ම ි | ව න ් න ෙ ම ු | ව න ් න ෙ හ ි | ව න ් න ෙ හ ු | ව න ් න ේ ය | ව න ් න ෝ ය | ව ම ි | ව ම ු | ව ය ි | ව හ ි | ව හ ු | ව න ් න ට | ව ම ි න ්];



read lexc g4.lexc
define Lexicong4;

######### Rewrite rules

###
define PeneAClass          ෙ -> 0 || න _ "^" [Bg4 | Cg4] ;
define PeneBClass         [..] -> න ් || .#. ?* _ න "^" [Cg4] ;

define GileAClass          ෙ -> 0 || ල _ "^" [Bg4 | Cg4] ;
define GileBClass         [..] -> ල ් || .#. ?* _ ල "^" [Cg4] ;

define ThibeAClass          ෙ -> 0 || බ _ "^" [Bg4 | Cg4] ;
define ThibeBClass         [..] -> බ ් || .#. ?* _ බ "^" [Cg4] ;


# To Cleanup: remove morpheme boundaries
define Cleanup "^" -> 0;

define Classg4Grammar 	Lexicong4                .o.
                        PeneAClass             .o.
                        PeneBClass             .o.
                        GileAClass             .o.
                        GileBClass             .o.
                        ThibeAClass             .o.
                        ThibeBClass             .o.
               	        Cleanup;



read lexc H.lexc
define LexiconH;

######### Rewrite rules



# To Cleanup: remove morpheme boundaries
define Cleanup "^" -> 0;

define ClassHGrammar 	LexiconH            .o.
                        
               	        Cleanup;


read lexc I1.lexc
define LexiconI1;




define BI1 [ි ත  ි|  ි ත ් ව ා | ු | ි න ් |  ි ල ් ල ා | ි ම ි | ි ම ු | ි ම ි ව ා  |  ි ම ු ව ා |ි ය ි | ි ව ු | ි ම ි න ්| ු ල ැ බ ූ |ි ද ් ද ී];    

define CI1 [ ත ් | ත ් ත ෙ ම ි | ත ් ත ෙ ම ු | ත ් ත ෙ හ ි | ත ් ත ෙ හ ු | ත ් ත ා ය | ත ් ත ේ ය | ත ් ත ෝ ය | ත | ත ් ත ො ත ් | ත ් ත ේ];

define DI1 [ු ණ ු | ූ | ු ව ෙ ම ි | ු ව ෙ ම ු | ු ව ෙ හ ි | ු ව ෙ හ ු | ු ව ා ය |  ු ව ේ ය | ු ව ෝ ​ ය | ේ | ෙ ම ි | ෙ ම ු | ෙ හ ි | ෙ හ ු | ෙ ය ි| ෙ ත ි | ව ෙ ය ි | ව ෙ ත ි | ව ේ ];



######### Rewrite rules

define CIRule1  ් -> 0 || _ "^" [BI1 | CI1 | DI1] ;
define CIRule2  න -> 0 || _ "^" CI1 ;
#define CIRule3  [..] -> ෙ || _ "^" CI1 ;
define CIRule4 [..] -> ැ || ග _ න "^" DI1 ;

# To Cleanup: remove morpheme boundaries
define Cleanup "^" -> 0;

define I1Grammar 	LexiconI1 .o.
		CIRule1		.o.
		CIRule2		.o.
              #	CIRule3		.o.
		CIRule4		.o.
		Cleanup;

read lexc J1.lexc
define LexiconJ1;


define BJ1 [ ා ප න ් | ා ප ල ් ල ා | ා | ෑ |​ෑ ව ෙ ම ි |​ෑ ව ෙ ම ු |ෑ ව ෙ හ ි |ෑ ව ෙ හ ු |ෑ ව ා ය | ෑ ව ේ ය |ෑ ව ෝ​ ය |ෑ ව ෝ​ ත් | ෑ ව ේ];

define CJ1 [ව ු ණ ු | ව ේ |ව ෙ ම ි |ව ෙ ම ු |ව ෙ හ ි |ව ෙ හ ු |ව ෙ ය ි|ව ෙ ත ි | ව ි ය];




######### Rewrite rules

define CJRule1  ා -> 0 || _ "^" BJ1  ;
define CJRule2  [..] -> ැ || A _ "^" CJ1 ;
define CJRule3  ා -> ෑ || _ "^" CJ1 ;

# To Cleanup: remove morpheme boundaries
define Cleanup "^" -> 0;

define J1Grammar 	LexiconJ1 .o.
		CJRule1		.o.
		CJRule2		.o.
              	CJRule3		.o.
		Cleanup;



define Bk1 [ ු ණ ු | ු න ෙ ම ි | ු න ෙ ම ු | ු න ෙ හ ි | ු න ෙ හ ු | ු න ේ ය | ු න ා ය | ු න ෝ ය | ි ය න ් | ි ය ල ් ල ා | ී | ි ය | ු න ො ත ් | ු න ේ | ී ම ට | ූ ];
 


read lexc k1.lexc
define Lexiconk1;

######### Rewrite rules

###
define WeAClass          ෙ -> 0 || _ "^" Bk1 ;




# To Cleanup: remove morpheme boundaries
define Cleanup "^" -> 0;

define Classk1Grammar 	Lexiconk1                .o.
                        WeAClass               .o.
               	        Cleanup;


define BL [හ ි න ් | ය ෙ ම ි |ය ෙ ම ු |ය ෙ හ ි | ය ෙ හ ු | ය ා ය |ය ේ ය|ය ෝ ය | ය ො ත ් ];


read lexc L.lexc
define LexiconL;

######### Rewrite rules

define CLRule1        [ය]  -> ග ි || .#. _   "^" BL ;

# To Cleanup: remove morpheme boundaries
define Cleanup "^" -> 0;

define ClassLGrammar 	LexiconL            .o.
                        CLRule1          .o.
               	        Cleanup;


define Bm1 [ ී ප න ් | ී ප ල ් ල ා | ී | ු න ් න ු | ු න ් න ෙ ම ි | ු න ් න ෙ ම ු | ු න ් න ෙ හ ි | ු න ් න ෙ හ ු | ු න ් න ේ ය | ු න ් න ා ය | ු න ් න ෝ ය | ි ය | ු න ් න හ ො ත ් | ු න ් න ේ ];



read lexc m1.lexc
define Lexiconm1;

######### Rewrite rules

define DeAClass           ෙ -> 0 || A _  "^" Bm1 ;



# To Cleanup: remove morpheme boundaries
define Cleanup "^" -> 0;

define Classm1Grammar 	Lexiconm1               .o.
                        DeAClass              .o.
               	        Cleanup;



read lexc N.lexc
define LexiconN;



define BN [ ව ු |ව ් ව ෙ ම ි | ව ු ව ෙ ම ු  |​ ව ් ව ා ය |​ව ් ව ෝ ය |  ව ් ව ේ |  ව ් ව ො ත ් |​ ව ් ව ෝ ය | ​ ව ් ව ේ ය | ​ ව ් ව ෙ ​ හ ු | ​ ව ් ව ෙ ​ හ ි]; 
define DN [ී | ී ​ප න ් |  ී ප ල ් ල ා | ි ය ];





######### Rewrite rules

define PClass1 ො -> ි ||  _  "^" BN ;
define PClass2 ො -> 0 ||  _  "^" DN ;




# To Cleanup: remove morpheme boundaries
define Cleanup "^" -> 0;

define ClassFifGrammar 	LexiconN            .o.
                        PClass1          .o.
                        PClass2          .o.
               	        Cleanup;


define Bo1 [ ු ණ ු | ූ | ු ව ෙ ම ි | ු ව ෙ ම ු | ු ව ෙ හ ි | ු ව ෙ හ ු | ු ව ා ය | ු ව ේ ය | ු ව ෝ ය | ව ේ | ෙ ම ි | ෙ ම ු | ෙ ය ි | ෙ හ ු | ෙ ත ි | ෙ හ ි | ව ෙ ය ි | ව ෙ ත ි | ේ | ි ය | ු ව ො ත ් | ු ව ේ ];



read lexc o1.lexc
define Lexicono1;

######### Rewrite rules

define KaraClass        [..]  -> ෙ || A _ A  "^" Bo1 ;


# To Cleanup: remove morpheme boundaries
define Cleanup "^" -> 0;
